Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Penalties

151.990.
Penalties.

Any person, city, county, or other governmental subdivision who violates KRS 151.100 to 151.460 shall be liable to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for said violation and in addition may be enjoined from continuing said violation. Each day upon which such violation occurs or continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates any determination, permit, administrative regulation, order, long-range water resource plan, or drought response plan of the Kentucky River Authority shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which the violation continues, and, in addition, may be concurrently enjoined from any violations as provided in KRS 151.725.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 38; 1992, ch. 453, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.